Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.331

Miscellaneous state funds—Abolished.

From and after the first day of May, 1955, all funds from which moneys are transferred to general fund accounts pursuant to RCW 43.79.330, are abolished.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.331. Prior: 1955 c s 370 s 2.]